src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON LONDON-UCASE-LOAN
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Lex:%:s K ; ! Ty^dal:s
+Err/Lex: LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
  +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K ;
+Err/Lex:%: LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; ! (If we understand SGL correctly)
+Err/Lex:∑- LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !
+Err/Lex:%: LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (:i ill only)
+Err/Lex:∑- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; ! (-i ill only)


LEXICON LONDON-OBL
                +Sg+Gen:a      K ;
         +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:a      K ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij     K ;
                +Sg+Loc:is     K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in     K ; !SOUTH
                +Sg+Com:ijn    K ;
       +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ain    K ;
                   +Ess:in     K ;
                +Pl+Nom:at     K ;
                +Pl+Gen:ijd    K ;
                +Pl+Acc:ijd    K ;
                +Pl+Ill:ijdda  K ;
                +Pl+Loc:ijn    K ;
                +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
       +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj     K ; ! Londonai
       +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:as     K ; ! Londonas

LEXICON LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG
                         +Sg+Gen:a      K ;
                         +Sg+Acc:a      K ;
                         +Sg+Ill:ij     K ;
                         +Sg+Loc:is     K ;
          +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in     K ; !SOUTH
                         +Sg+Com:ijn    K ;
                            +Ess:in     K ;
!                        +Pl+Nom:at     K ;
!                        +Pl+Gen:ijd    K ;
!                        +Pl+Acc:ijd    K ;
!                        +Pl+Ill:ijdda  K ;
!                        +Pl+Loc:ijn    K ;
!                        +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;


LEXICON DUBAI-plc
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON DUBAI_MWE-plc
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUBAI-fem
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> DUBAI-UCASE ;

LEXICON DUBAI-mal
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> DUBAI-UCASE ;

LEXICON DUBAI-sur
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> DUBAI-UCASE ;

LEXICON DUBAI-obj
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> DUBAI-UCASE ;


LEXICON DUBAI-org
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASE
@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASEcase ;

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASEcase
+Sg+Nom:i K ;
+Attr:i K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:i RHyph ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:is K ; ! Ty^dal:s
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:i K ;
+Sg+Gen:ja K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:ja RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:ja K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:i K ;
+Sg+Ill:jij K ;
+Sg+Loc:jas K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:jan K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:jain K ;
+Ess:jan K ;
+Pl+Nom:jat K ;
+Pl+Gen:jajd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jajd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jajde K ;
+Pl+Loc:jain K ;
+Pl+Com:jaigujn K ;
+Err/Orth:%:i  BERN-OBL-COLON ; !
+Err/Orth:%i∑- BERN-OBL-COLON ; !
+Err/Orth:%:i  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
+Err/Orth:%i∑- LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORGcase ;

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORGcase
+Sg+Nom:i K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:i RHyph ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:is K ; ! Dubais
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:ias K ; ! Dubais
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:i%:s K ; ! Nervei:s
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:i K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:i K ;
:j DUBAI-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+Err/Orth:j BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-OBL_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Cmp/SgGen:a RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:as K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ain K ;
+Ess:an K ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ain K ;
!+Pl+Com:aigujn K ;



LEXICON BERN-ani
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> BERNDECL_PRS ;

LEXICON BERN-surmal
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames.
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> BERNDECL_PRS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Aud^hild.
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> BERNDECL_PRS ;

!LEXICON BERN-femplc
!! Different lexicon for female persons and place names.
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> BERNDECL_PRS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;

!LEXICON BERN-surplc
!! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
!:%>a PLACELASH ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr: flagK ;
+Err/Lex:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON BERN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr: flagK ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON BERN-plc-not-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON BERN_MWE-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON BERN-objsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both objects and surnames.
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERNDECL ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
@U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE ;

LEXICON BERNDECL_PRS ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
@U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE_PRS ;

LEXICON BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
@U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON BERNDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
@U.Cap.Obl@ BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-UCASE
               +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
                 +Attr:    K                  ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:    RHyph              ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                           BERN-OBL           ;
             +Err/Orth:%:  BERN-OBL-COLON     ; !
             +Err/Orth:∑-  BERN-OBL-COLON     ; !
             +Err/Orth:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
             +Err/Orth:∑-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON BERN-UCASE_PRS
                +Sg+Nom:       K                  ;
                  +Attr:       K                  ;
             +Cmp/SgNom:       RHyph              ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:       RProp              ;
       +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s    K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
         +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:       K                  ;
                +Sg+Gen:a      K                  ;
             +Cmp/SgGen:a      RHyph              ;
                +Sg+Acc:a      K                  ;
         +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:       K                  ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij     K                  ;
                +Sg+Ill:aj     K                  ;
                +Sg+Loc:as     K                  ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an     K                  ; !SOUTH
       +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijn    K                  ; !Sub? Billiin, Stordahliin
                +Sg+Com:ain    K                  ;
                   +Ess:an     K                  ;
                +Pl+Nom:at     K                  ;
                +Pl+Gen:ajd9   K                  ;
                +Pl+Acc:ajd9   K                  ;
                +Pl+Ill:ajde   K                  ;
                +Pl+Loc:ain    K                  ;
                +Pl+Com:aigujn K                  ;
              +Err/Orth:%:     BERN-OBL-COLON     ; !
              +Err/Orth:∑-     BERN-OBL-COLON     ; !
              +Err/Orth:%:     LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
              +Err/Orth:∑-     LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON BERN-UCASE_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:    RHyph              ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                           BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ;
             +Err/Orth:%:  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
                +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:       K     ;
             +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgGen:       RHyph ;
                +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:       K     ;
               +Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K     ;
              +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K     ;
             +Err/Orth:∑-  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
             +Err/Orth:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
             +Err/Orth:∑-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !


LEXICON BERN-UCASE-LOAN
                          +Sg+Nom:       K                  ;
                       +Cmp/SgNom:       RHyph              ;
            +Cmp/SgNom:       RProp              ;
                 +Sg+Loc+Err/Lex:%:s    K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                        +Err/Lex:       BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
                        +Err/Lex:%:     BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
                +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:       K     ;
             +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgGen:       RHyph ;
                +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:       K     ;
               +Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K     ;
              +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-GC:       K     ;
                        +Err/Lex:∑-     BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
                        +Err/Lex:%:     LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
                        +Err/Lex:∑-     LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
                 +Sg+Gen+Err/Lex:       K                  ;
                 +Sg+Gen+Err/Lex:a      K                  ;
              +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Lex:a      RHyph              ; ! Gen is sub
                 +Sg+Acc+Err/Lex:a      K                  ;
          +Sg+Acc+Use/NG+Err/Lex:       K                  ;
                 +Sg+Ill+Err/Lex:i      K                  ;
                 +Sg+Ill+Err/Lex:aj     K                  ; !Lakselvai
                 +Sg+Loc+Err/Lex:as     K                  ;
           +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Lex:an     K                  ; !SOUTH
                 +Sg+Com+Err/Lex:ain    K                  ;
                    +Ess+Err/Lex:an     K                  ;
!                +Pl+Nom+Err/Lex:at     K                  ;
!                +Pl+Gen+Err/Lex:ajd9   K                  ;
!                +Pl+Acc+Err/Lex:ajd9   K                  ;
!                +Pl+Ill+Err/Lex:ajde   K                  ;
!                +Pl+Loc+Err/Lex:ain    K                  ;
!                +Pl+Com+Err/Lex:aigujn K                  ;


LEXICON BERN-OBL
         +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:       K     ;
                +Sg+Gen:a      K     ;
             +Cmp/SgGen:a      RHyph ;
                +Sg+Acc:a      K     ;
         +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:       K     ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij     K     ;
       +Sg+Err/Orth+Ill:aj     K     ;
                +Sg+Loc:as     K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an     K     ; !SOUTH
       +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijn    K     ; !Sub? Billiin, Stordahliin
                +Sg+Com:ain    K     ;
                   +Ess:an     K     ;
                +Pl+Nom:at     K     ;
                +Pl+Gen:ajd9   K     ;
                +Pl+Acc:ajd9   K     ;
                +Pl+Ill:ajde   K     ;
                +Pl+Loc:ain    K     ;
                +Pl+Com:aigujn K     ;

LEXICON BERN-OBL-COLON
                +Sg+Gen:a   K ;
                +Sg+Acc:a   K ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij  K ;
                +Sg+Ill:aj  K ;
                +Sg+Loc:as  K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:an  K ; !SOUTH
       +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijn K ; !Sub? Bill:iin, Stordahl:iin
                +Sg+Com:ain K ;
                   +Ess:an  K ;
